Washington statutes.
RCW 9.45.220

Making false sample or assay of ore.

Any person who shall, with intent to cheat, wrong or defraud, make or publish a false sample of ore or bullion, or who shall make or publish or cause to be published a false assay of ore or bullion, is guilty of a class C felony, punishable by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not less than one year nor more than five years, or by a fine of not less than fifty nor more than one thousand dollars, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

[ 2003 c 53 s 33; 1890 p 99 s 3; RRS s 2713.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.